Oklahoma, session 2026, SB2146.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2888, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2888. A. 1. The term “homestead”, as used in the


provisions of the Ad Valorem Tax Code governing homestead


exemptions, shall mean and include the actual residence of a natural


person who is a citizen of this state, provided the record actual


ownership of such residence be vested in such natural person


residing and domiciled thereon. Any single person of legal age,


married couple and their minor child or children or the minor child


or children of a deceased person, whether residing together or


separated, or surviving spouse shall be allowed under Section 2801


et seq. of this title only one homestead exemption in this state.

Req. No. 2914 Page 1


No person or the family of such person shall be required to be


domiciled thereon if such person is in the armed service of the


United States in time of war or during a state of national emergency


as declared by the Congress or the President of the United States,


and such person shall not be required to be domiciled thereon in


order to assert or claim the exemption provided in Section 2889 of


this title, and such exemption may be claimed by any agent of, or


member of the family of, such person. The surviving spouse and/or


and minor children of a deceased person shall be considered record


owners of the homestead where the title of record in the office of


the county clerk on January 1 is in the name of the deceased, but in


all other cases the deed or other evidence of ownership must shall


be of record in the office of the county clerk on January 1 in order


for any person to be qualified as the record owner. However, a


natural person actually owning, residing, and domiciled in the


residence on January 1 shall be deemed to be the record owner of the


residence on January 1, within the meaning of this section, if the


deed or other evidence of ownership of such person, executed on or


before January 1, be of record in the office of the county clerk on


or before February 1 immediately following. Despite any provision


to the contrary in this section, if a parent or parents residing and


domiciled in the residence own the residence jointly with one or


more of their children, whether residing together or separated, and


where the record joint ownership of the property is recorded in the

Req. No. 2914 Page 2


office of the county clerk in accordance with the provisions of this


section, the parent or parents residing and domiciled in the


residence shall be entitled to the entire homestead exemption. A


rural homestead shall not include more than one hundred sixty (160)


acres of land and the improvements thereon, except for homesteads


that include any land classified as agricultural land or land


classified with a use category, as defined in Section 2802 of this


title, that is agricultural use. An urban homestead shall not


include any land except the lot or lots, or the unplatted tract,


upon which are located the dwelling, garage, barn and/or and other


outbuildings necessary or convenient for family use.


2. Despite any provision to the contrary in this section, the


person actually owning, residing, and domiciled in the residence as


of the date of a tornado shall be deemed to be the record owner of


the residence on such date, within the meaning of this section, if


the deed or other evidence of ownership of such person, executed on


or before such date, be of record in the office of the county clerk


on or before such date. However, the provisions of this paragraph


shall only apply to any person who is eligible to claim the income


tax credit pursuant to Section 2357.29A of this title with respect


to a tornado or to any person whose primary residence was damaged or


destroyed in a tornado and who purchased or built a new primary


residence at a location within this state other than the location of


the damaged or destroyed residence. For the purposes of this

Req. No. 2914 Page 3


section, “tornado” means a tornado which occurred in calendar year


2013 or any subsequent tornado for which a Presidential Major


Disaster Declaration was issued.


B. The term “rural homestead” as used herein shall mean and


include any homestead that includes any land classified as


agricultural land or land classified with a use category, as defined


in Section 2802 of this title, that is agricultural use, or any


homestead located outside a city or town or outside any platted


subdivision or addition. A homestead that includes any land


classified as agricultural land or land classified with a use


category, as defined in Section 2802 of this title, that is


agricultural use, shall also include any residential and


nonresidential improvements affixed or located thereon.


C. The term “urban homestead” as used herein shall mean and


include any homestead located within any city or town whether


incorporated or unincorporated, except homesteads that include any


land classified as agricultural land or land classified with a use


category, as defined in Section 2802 of this title, that is


agricultural use, or located within a platted subdivision or


addition, whether such subdivision or addition be a part of a city


or town. In no case shall an urban homestead exceed in area one (1)


acre.


D. For purposes of the provisions of Section 8E and Section 8F


of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution, if a disabled veteran,

Req. No. 2914 Page 4


the surviving spouse of a disabled veteran or the surviving spouse


of a person who died while in the line of duty occupies improvements


which are affixed to the real property and record title to such real


property is held by a city or town or an entity formed pursuant to


the charter provisions or ordinances of a city or town or formed


under other provisions of law for the benefit of such city or town,


the improvements shall be considered to be the homestead of such


disabled veteran or the surviving spouse of such disabled veteran


for all purposes related to the homestead exemption authorized by


the provisions of the Ad Valorem Tax Code and the homestead


exemption shall not be denied on the basis that title to such


affixed improvements is held by a disabled veteran or surviving


spouse or an entity formed by them than the city or town which holds


title to the real property consisting of the land to which such


improvements are affixed.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective January 1, 2027.




60-2-2914 QD 1/15/2026 1:37:23 PM













Req. No. 2914 Page 5